Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.38
Training curriculum, defined.

Training curriculum means an established set of course topics for instruction in an accredited training program for a particular lead-based paint profession designed to provide specialized knowledge and skills.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 40.